src/orthography/spellrelax-with-tags.xfscript
! Tags to be appended to an fst to get spell-relax tags:
define spellrelax [
 â (->) a "aaX" || _ ?* "^a2aa" ,,
 ê (->) e "eeX" || _ ?* "^e2ee" ,,
 î (->) i "iiX" || _ ?* "^i2ii" ,,
 ô (->) o "ooX" || _ ?* "^o2oo" ,,
 a (->) â  "aX" || _ ?* "^aa2a" ,,
 i (->) î  "iX" || _ ?* "^ii2i" ,,
 o (->) ô  "oX" || _ ?* "^oo2o" ];

define Restr1 "^a2aa" => "aaX" ?* _ ;
define Restr2 "^e2ee" => "eeX" ?* _ ;
define Restr3 "^i2ii" => "iiX" ?* _ ;
define Restr4 "^o2oo" => "ooX" ?* _ ;
define Restr5 "^aa2a" =>  "aX" ?* _ ;
define Restr6 "^ii2i" =>  "iX" ?* _ ;
define Restr7 "^oo2o" =>  "oX" ?* _ ;

define Clean "aaX" -> 0,
             "eeX" -> 0,
             "iiX" -> 0,
             "ooX" -> 0,
              "aX" -> 0,
              "iX" -> 0,
              "oX" -> 0,
           "^a2aa" -> 0,
           "^e2ee" -> 0,
           "^i2ii" -> 0,
           "^o2oo" -> 0,
           "^aa2a" -> 0,
           "^ii2i" -> 0,
           "^oo2o" -> 0,
           "^oo2o" -> 0;

read regex spellrelax .o.
           Restr1     .o.
           Restr2     .o.
           Restr3     .o.
           Restr4     .o.
           Restr5     .o.
           Restr6     .o.
           Restr7     .o.
           Clean ;
